Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 11.1. Domestication.

§ 13.1-898.1:1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Domesticated corporation”
means the domesticating corporation as it continues in existence after a domestication.

“Domesticating corporation”
means the domestic corporation that approves a plan of domestication pursuant to §

13.1-898.3

or the foreign corporation that approves a domestication pursuant to the organic law of the foreign corporation.

“Domestication”
means a transaction pursuant to this article, including domestication of a foreign corporation as a domestic corporation or domestication of a domestic corporation in another jurisdiction, where the other jurisdiction authorizes such a transaction even if by another name.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 13.1-898.2.
Domestication.

A foreign corporation may become a domestic corporation if the laws of the jurisdiction in which the foreign corporation is incorporated authorize it to domesticate in another jurisdiction. The laws of the Commonwealth shall govern the effect of domesticating in the Commonwealth pursuant to this article.

A domestic corporation not required by law to be a domestic corporation may become a foreign corporation if the jurisdiction in which the corporation intends to domesticate allows for the domestication. Regardless of whether the laws of the foreign jurisdiction require the adoption of a plan of domestication, the domestication shall be approved in the manner provided in this article. The laws of the jurisdiction in which the corporation domesticates shall govern the effect of domesticating in that jurisdiction.

The plan of domestication shall set forth:

A statement of the jurisdiction in which the corporation is to be domesticated;

The terms and conditions of the domestication; and

For a foreign corporation that is to become a domestic corporation, as a referenced attachment, amended and restated articles of incorporation that comply with the requirements of §

13.1-819

as they will be in effect upon consummation of the domestication.

The plan of domestication may include any other provision relating to the domestication.

The plan of domestication may also include a provision that the board of directors may amend the plan at any time prior to issuance of the certificate of domestication or such other document required by the laws of the other jurisdiction to consummate the domestication. Where a plan of domestication is required to be submitted to the members for their approval, an amendment made subsequent to the submission of the plan to the members of the corporation shall not alter or change any of the terms or conditions of the plan if such alteration or change would adversely affect the members of any class of the corporation.

History.

2003, c. 374; 2007, c. 925; 2012, c. 130.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in the last sentence of subsection A; and in subsection E, in the last sentence, substituted “or” for “and” preceding “conditions” and “the” for “such” near the end.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 added subdivision C 3; deleted subdivision D 1, which formerly read: “Subject to the provisions of subsection C, amendments to the articles of incorporation of the corporation following its domestication or a restatement of the articles of incorporation; and”; combined the former introductory language of subsection D and subdivision D 2 into subsection D; and made related changes.

§ 13.1-898.3.
Action on plan of domestication by a domestic corporation.

When the members of a domestic corporation have voting rights, a plan of domestication shall be adopted in the following manner:

The board of directors of the corporation shall adopt the plan of domestication.

After adopting a plan of domestication, the board of directors shall submit the plan of domestication for approval by the members.

For a plan of domestication to be approved:

The board of directors shall recommend the plan to the members unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interests or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members with the plan; and

The members shall approve the plan as provided in subdivision 6 of this subsection.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of domestication to the members on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each member entitled to vote of the proposed members’ meeting in accordance with §

13.1-842

at which the plan of domestication is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the plan and shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the plan.

Unless this Act or the board of directors, acting pursuant to subdivision 4 of this subsection, requires a greater vote, the plan of domestication shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote on the plan by more than two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast by that voting group. The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser vote than that provided for in this subdivision or a vote by separate voting groups so long as the vote provided for is not less than a majority of all the votes cast on the plan by each voting group entitled to vote on the plan at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

Voting by a class of members as a separate voting group is required on a plan of domestication if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would entitle the class to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed amendment under §

13.1-887

.

When a domestic corporation has no members, or no members have voting rights, a plan of domestication shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors of such corporation upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

2003, c. 374; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 deleted “also” preceding “state” in the last sentence of subdivision A 5; and in subdivision A 6, in the first sentence, substituted “Act” for “chapter,” deleted “to be authorized” following “domestication,” substituted “entitled to be cast” for “cast on the plan” and deleted “at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists” at the end.

§ 13.1-898.4.
Articles of domestication.

After the domestication of a foreign corporation is approved in the manner required by the laws of the jurisdiction in which the corporation is incorporated, the corporation shall file with the Commission articles of domestication setting forth:

The name of the corporation immediately prior to the filing of the articles of domestication and, if that name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth or the corporation desires to change its name in connection with the domestication, a name that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-829

;

The plan of domestication;

The original jurisdiction of the corporation and the date the corporation was incorporated in that jurisdiction, and each subsequent jurisdiction and the date the corporation was domesticated in each such jurisdiction, if any, prior to the filing of the articles of domestication; and

A statement that the domestication is permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction in which the corporation is incorporated and that the corporation has complied with those laws in effecting the domestication.

If the Commission finds that the articles of domestication comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of domestication.

The certificate of domestication shall become effective pursuant to §

13.1-806

.

A foreign corporation’s existence as a domestic corporation shall begin when the certificate of domestication is effective. Upon becoming effective, the certificate of domestication shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the foreign corporation have been complied with and that the corporation has been incorporated under this Act.

If the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth under Article 14 (§

13.1-919

et seq.), its certificate of authority shall be canceled automatically on the effective date of the certificate of domestication issued by the Commission.

History.

2003, c. 374; 2007, c. 925; 2012, c. 130.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision A 1 and in subsection F; and substituted “Act” for “chapter” in subsections B, E and F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 deleted former subsection B, which formerly read: “The articles of domestication shall have attached articles of incorporation that comply with the requirements of this Act”; redesignated former subsections C through F as subsections B through E; and in subsection E, substituted “shall be canceled” for “shall be cancelled” and deleted “of this Act” following “(§

13.1-919

et seq.).”

§ 13.1-898.5.
Surrender of articles of incorporation upon domestication.

Whenever a domestic corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by this article, a plan of domestication providing for the corporation to be domesticated under the laws of another jurisdiction, the corporation shall file with the Commission articles of incorporation surrender setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The jurisdiction in which the corporation is to be domesticated and the name of the corporation upon its domestication under the laws of that jurisdiction;

The plan of domestication;

A statement that the articles of incorporation surrender are being filed in connection with the domestication of the corporation as a foreign corporation to be incorporated under the laws of another jurisdiction and that the corporation is surrendering its charter under the laws of the Commonwealth;

Where the members of the corporation have voting rights, a statement:

That the plan was adopted by the unanimous consent of the members; or

That the plan was submitted to the members by the board of directors in accordance with this Act, and a statement of:

The existence of a quorum of each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the plan by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan separately by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the plan by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group;

Where the corporation has no members, or no members having voting rights, then a statement of that fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was adopted and a statement of the fact that such plan received the vote of a majority of the directors in office;

A statement that the corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was incorporated in the Commonwealth;

A mailing address to which the clerk may mail a copy of any process served on the clerk under subdivision 7; and

A commitment by the corporation to notify the clerk of the Commission in the future of any change in the mailing address of the corporation.

If the Commission finds that the articles of incorporation surrender comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of incorporation surrender.

The corporation shall automatically cease to be a domestic corporation when the certificate of incorporation surrender becomes effective.

If the former domestic corporation intends to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth, then, within 30 days after the effective date of the certificate of incorporation surrender, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth pursuant to §

13.1-921

together with a copy of its instrument of domestication and articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated or domesticated.

Service of process on the clerk of the Commission is service of process on a former domestic corporation that has surrendered its charter pursuant to this section. Service on the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

and service on the former domestic corporation may be made in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

2003, c. 374; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivisions A 4 and A 7; substituted “a statement” for “either” in subdivision A 5; substituted “That” for “A statement that” in subdivisions A 5 a and A 5 b; and substituted “Act” for “chapter” in subdivision A 5 b.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote subdivision A 2, which read “The corporation’s new jurisdiction of incorporation”; deleted “domestic” preceding “corporation” in subdivision A 7; substituted “the clerk” for “him” in subdivision A 8; inserted “by the corporation” in subdivision A 9; and added subsection E.

§ 13.1-898.6.
Effect of domestication.

When a foreign corporation’s certificate of domestication in the Commonwealth becomes effective, with respect to that corporation:

The title to all real estate and other property remains in the corporation without reversion or impairment;

The liabilities remain the liabilities of the corporation;

A proceeding pending may be continued by or against the corporation as if the domestication did not occur;

The articles of incorporation attached to the articles of domestication constitute the articles of incorporation of the corporation; and

The corporation is deemed to:

Be incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth for all purposes;

Be the same corporation as the corporation that existed under the laws of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which it was originally incorporated or formerly domiciled; and

Have been incorporated on the date it was originally incorporated or organized.

Any member or director of a foreign corporation that domesticates into the Commonwealth who, prior to the domestication, was liable for the liabilities or obligations of the corporation is not released from those liabilities or obligations by reason of the domestication.

History.

2003, c. 374; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A, subdivision A 5 a and in subsection B.

§ 13.1-898.7.
Abandonment of domestication.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of domestication, after a plan of domestication has been adopted and approved by a domestic corporation as required by this article, and at any time before the certificate of incorporation surrender has become effective, the plan may be abandoned by the corporation without action by its members in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

A domesticating corporation that is a foreign corporation may abandon its domestication to a domestic corporation in the manner prescribed by its organic law.

If a domestication is abandoned after articles of incorporation surrender or articles of domestication have been filed with the Commission but before the certificate of incorporation surrender or certificate of domestication has become effective, a statement of abandonment signed by the domesticating corporation shall be delivered to the Commission for filing prior to the effective time and date of the certificate of incorporation surrender or certificate of domestication. If the Commission finds that the statement of abandonment complies with the requirements of law, it shall issue a certificate of abandonment, effective as of the date and time the statement of abandonment was received by the Commission, and the domestication shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

The statement of abandonment shall contain:

The name of the domesticating corporation and its jurisdiction of formation;

When the domestication corporation is a foreign corporation, the name of the domesticated corporation set forth in the articles of domestication;

The date on which the articles of incorporation surrender or articles of domestication were filed with the Commission;

The date and time on which the Commission’s certificate of incorporation surrender or certificate of domestication becomes effective; and

A statement that domestication is being abandoned in accordance with this section or, when the domesticating corporation is a foreign corporation, a statement that the foreign corporation abandoned the domestication as required by its organic law.

History.

2003, c. 374; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 inserted “as provided” preceding “under subsection A” in the first sentence of subsection B; and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote subsection A; and in subsection C, substituted “jurisdiction in which the foreign corporation is incorporated” for “foreign jurisdiction,” deleted “in the Commonwealth” preceding “written notice” and substituted “effective time and date” for “effective date.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.